Nevada, session 83, AB305-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 338.01165 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
338.01165 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter and except as otherwise provided in this section, a
contractor or subcontractor engaged in vertical construction who
employs a worker on a public work pursuant to NRS 338.040 shall
use one or more apprentices for at least 10 percent of the total hours
of labor worked for each apprenticed craft or type of work to be
performed on the public work for which more than three workers are
employed. To the extent practicable, at least 2 percent of the hours
of labor that is required to be performed by apprentices must be
performed by women. For purposes of this subsection, “to the
extent practicable” means to the extent the requirement to have at
least 2 percent of the hours of labor to be performed by
apprentices who are women is feasible or capable of being done or
carried out with reasonable effort, taking into account the number
and availability of apprentices who are women in the applicable
apprenticed craft or type of work.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and
except as otherwise provided in this section, a contractor or
subcontractor engaged in horizontal construction who employs a
worker on a public work pursuant to NRS 338.040 shall use one or
more apprentices for at least 3 percent of the total hours of labor
worked for each apprenticed craft or type of work to be performed
on the public work for which more than three workers are
employed. To the extent practicable, at least 1 percent of the hours
of labor that is required to be performed by apprentices must be
performed by women. For purposes of this subsection, “to the
extent practicable” means to the extent the requirement to have at
least 3 percent of the hours of labor to be performed by
apprentices who are women is feasible or capable of being done or
carried out with reasonable effort, taking into account the number
and availability of apprentices who are women in the applicable
apprenticed craft or type of work.
3. On or after January 1, 2021, the Labor Commissioner, in
collaboration with the State Apprenticeship Council, may adopt
regulations to increase the percentage of total hours of labor
required to be performed by an apprentice pursuant to subsection 1
or 2 by not more than 2 percentage points.
4. An apprentice who graduates from an apprenticeship
program while employed on a public work shall:
-
*AB305_R2*

– 3 –
(a) Be deemed an apprentice on the public work for the purposes
of subsections 1 and 2.
(b) Be deemed a journeyman for all other purposes, including,
without limitation, the payment of wages or the payment of wages
and benefits to a journeyman covered by a collective bargaining
agreement.
5. A contractor or subcontractor engaged on a public work is
not required to use an apprentice , regardless of gender, in a craft or
type of work performed in a jurisdiction recognized by the State
Apprenticeship Council as not having apprentices in that craft or
type of work.
6. A public body may, upon the request of a contractor or
subcontractor, submit a request to the Labor Commissioner to
modify or waive the percentage of hours of labor provided by one or
more apprentices required pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 for good
cause. A public body must submit such a request, before an
advertisement for bids has been placed, the opening of bids or the
award of a contract for a public work or after the public body has
commenced work on the public work. Such a request must include
any supporting documentation, including, without limitation, proof
of denial of or failure to approve a request for apprentices pursuant
to subparagraph (3) of paragraph (d) of subsection [10.] 11.
7. The Labor Commissioner shall issue a determination of
whether to grant a modification or waiver requested pursuant to
subsection 6 within 15 days after the receipt of such request. The
Labor Commissioner may grant such a request if he or she makes a
finding that there is good cause to modify or waive the percentage
of hours of labor provided by one or more apprentices required
pursuant to subsection 1 or 2.
8. A public body, contractor or subcontractor may request a
hearing on the determination of the Labor Commissioner within 10
days after receipt of the determination of the Labor Commissioner.
The hearing must be conducted in accordance with regulations
adopted by the Labor Commissioner. If the Labor Commissioner
does not receive a request for a hearing pursuant to this subsection,
the determination of the Labor Commissioner is a final decision for
the purposes of judicial review pursuant to chapter 233B of NRS.
9. A contractor or subcontractor engaged on a public work
shall enter into an apprenticeship agreement for all apprentices
required to be used in the construction of a public work. If the Labor
Commissioner granted a modification or waiver pursuant to
subsection 7 because the Labor Commissioner finds that a request
for apprentices was denied or the request was not approved within 5
business days as described in subparagraph (3) of paragraph (d) of
subsection [10] 11 and apprentices are later provided, then the
-
*AB305_R2*

– 4 –
contractor or subcontractor shall enter into an apprenticeship
agreement for all apprentices later provided.
10. If a contractor or subcontractor does not meet the
requirements set forth in subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, to have a
percentage of the hours of labor performed by apprentices who are
women, there is a rebuttable presumption that there were not
enough apprentices who are women available to comply with such
requirements. If an apprenticeship program is unable to rebut the
presumption, the State Apprenticeship Council shall, at least once
every two years, require the apprenticeship program to appear
before the State Apprenticeship Council to review the policies of
the program to recruit women. The State Apprenticeship Council
may, without limitation, recommend improvements for recruiting
women to the apprenticeship program.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” means a person enrolled in an apprenticeship
program recognized by the State Apprenticeship Council.
(b) “Apprenticed craft or type of work” means a craft or type of
work for which there is an existing apprenticeship program
recognized by the State Apprenticeship Council.
(c) “Apprenticeship program” means an apprenticeship program
recognized by the State Apprenticeship Council.
(d) “Good cause” means:
(1) There are no apprentices available from an apprenticeship
program within the jurisdiction where the public work is to be
completed as recognized by the State Apprenticeship Council;
(2) The contractor or subcontractor is required to perform
uniquely complex or hazardous tasks on the public work that require
the skill and expertise of a greater percentage of journeymen; or
(3) The contractor or subcontractor has requested apprentices
from an apprenticeship program and the request has been denied or
the request has not been approved within 5 business days.
 The term does not include the refusal of a contractor or
subcontractor to enter into an apprenticeship agreement pursuant to
subsection 9.
(e) “Journeyman” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 624.260.
(f) “State Apprenticeship Council” means the State
Apprenticeship Council created by NRS 610.030.
Sec. 2. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to a
contract for a public work for which bids have been submitted
before January 1, 2024.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2024.
H
-
*AB305_R2*